Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
831

UNIFORM
ACT ON STATUS OF CONVICTED PERSONS

Section

831-1 Definition

831-2 Rights lost

831-3 Rights retained by convicted person

831-3.1 Prior convictions; criminal records;
noncriminal

standards

831-3.2 Expungement orders

831-4 Saving provisions

831-5 Certificate of discharge

831-6 Uniformity of interpretation

831-7 Short title

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next